West Virginia, session 2026, SB327.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. State Auditor. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on February 7, 2025, authorized under the authority of §12-3-10 of this code, modified by the State Auditor to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 17, 2025, relating to the State Auditor (standards for requisitions for payment issued by the state officers on the Auditor, 155 CSR 01), is authorized.